Maine, session 132, LD209.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill, as emergency legislation, proposes to make supplemental appropriations and
allocations from the General Fund and other funds for the expenditures of State
Government and to change certain provisions of the law necessary to the proper operations
of State Government for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, as submitted by the Governor
pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5.
The documents submitted by the Governor may be found here:
https://legislature.maine.gov/12509.
Page 1 - 132LR2408(01)